Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.68.020

Requesting unlawful compensation.

(1) A public servant is guilty of requesting unlawful compensation if he or she requests a pecuniary benefit for the performance of an official action knowing that he or she is required to perform that action without compensation or at a level of compensation lower than that requested.

(2) Requesting unlawful compensation is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 387; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.68.020.]